Utah, session 2026, HB1.
Section 1. Section 53F-2-301 is amended to read:53F-2-301Effective 07/01/26. Minimum basic tax rate for a fiscal year that begins after July 1, 2022.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Basic levy increment rate" means a tax rate that will generate an amount of revenue equal to $75,000,000.(b)"Commission" means the State Tax Commission.(c)"Minimum basic local amount" means an amount that is:(i)equal to the sum of:(A)the school districts' contribution to the basic school program the previous fiscal year;(B)the amount generated by the basic levy increment rate; and(C)the eligible new growth, as defined in Section 59-2-924 and rules of the State Tax Commission multiplied by the minimum basic rate; and(ii)set annually by the Legislature in Subsection (2)(a).(d)"Minimum basic tax rate" means a tax rate certified by consensus between the commission, the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget, and the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst that will generate an amount of revenue equal to the minimum basic local amount described in Subsection (2)(a).(2)(a)The minimum basic local amount for the fiscal year that begins on July 1, 20252026, is $810,593,200$866,842,700 in revenue statewide.(b)The preliminary estimate of the minimum basic tax rate for a fiscal year that begins on July 1, 20252026, is .001408.001352.(3)(a)On or before June 22, the commission, the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget, and the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall by consensus certify the minimum basic tax rate for the year.(b)The estimate of the minimum basic tax rate provided in Subsection (2)(b) is based on a forecast for property values for the next calendar year.(c)The certified minimum basic tax rate described in Subsection (3)(a) is based on property values as of January 1 of the current calendar year, except personal property, which is based on values from the previous calendar year.(4)(a)To qualify for receipt of the state contribution toward the basic school program and as a school district's contribution toward the cost of the basic school program for the school district, each local school board shall impose the minimum basic tax rate.(b)(i)The state is not subject to the notice requirements of Section 59-2-926 before imposing the tax rates described in this Subsection (4).(ii)The state is subject to the notice requirements of Section 59-2-926 if the state authorizes a tax rate that exceeds the tax rates described in this Subsection (4).(5)(a)The state shall contribute to each school district toward the cost of the basic school program in the school district an amount of money that is the difference between the cost of the school district's basic school program and the sum of revenue generated by the school district by the following:(i)the minimum basic tax rate; and(ii)the basic levy increment rate.(b)(i)If the difference described in Subsection (5)(a) equals or exceeds the cost of the basic school program in a school district, no state contribution shall be made to the basic school program for the school district.(ii)The proceeds of the difference described in Subsection (5)(a) that exceed the cost of the basic school program shall be paid into the Uniform School Fund as provided by law and by the close of the fiscal year in which the proceeds were calculated.(6)Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the Division of Finance shall deposit an amount equal to the proceeds generated statewide by the basic levy increment rate into the Minimum Basic Growth Account created in Section 53F-9-302.(7)Nothing in the repeal of the tax rate indexed to the increase in the value of the WPU affects the ongoing appropriations to the Teacher and Student Success Account created in Section 53F-9-306.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53F-2-311 is amended to read:53F-2-311Effective 07/01/26. Weighted pupil units for career and technical education programs -- Funding of approved programs -- Performance measures -- Qualifying criteria.(1)(a)Money appropriated to the state board for approved career and technical education programs and the comprehensive guidance program:(i)shall be allocated to eligible recipients as provided in Subsections (2), (3), and (4); and(ii)may not be used to fund programs below grade 9.(b)Subsection (1)(a)(ii) does not apply to the following programs:(i)comprehensive guidance; and(ii)work-based learning programs.(2)(a)Weighted pupil units are computed for pupils in approved programs.(b)(i)The state board shall fund approved programs based upon hours of membership of grades 9 through 12 students.(ii)Subsection (2)(b)(i) does not apply to the following programs:(A)comprehensive guidance; and(B)work-based learning programs.(c)The state board shall use an amount not to exceed 20% of the total appropriation under this section to fund approved programs based on performance measures such as placement and competency attainment defined in standards set by the state board.(d)The state board shall make the necessary calculations for distribution of the appropriation to a school district and charter school and may revise and recommend changes necessary for achieving equity and ease of administration.(3)(a)Twenty weighted pupil units shall be computed for career and technical education administrative costs for each school district, except 25 weighted pupil units may be computed for each school district that consolidates career and technical education administrative services with one or more other school districts.(b)Between 10 and 25 weighted pupil units shall be computed for each high school conducting approved career and technical education programs in a school district according to standards established by the state board.(c)Forty weighted pupil units shall be computed for each school district that operates an approved career and technical education center, which may include a comprehensive high school that meets the requirements of this Subsection (3).(d)Between five and seven weighted pupil units shall be computed for each summer career and technical education agriculture program according to standards established by the state board.(e)(i)The state board shall, by rule, establish qualifying criteria for a school district or charter school to receive weighted pupil units under this Subsection (3).(ii)In making rules under Subsection (3)(e)(i), the state board may not regulate the operational structure or staffing model of a career and technical education center.(f)(i)A comprehensive high school may qualify as an approved career and technical education center under Subsection (3)(c) if the high school offers career and technical education programs that meet state board standards.(ii)A local school board or charter school governing board may determine the administrative structure for a career and technical education center, including whether to designate a separate administrator for the center.(4)(a)Money remaining after the allocations made under Subsections (2) and (3) shall be allocated using average daily membership in approved programs for the previous year.(b)A school district or charter school that has experienced student growth in grades 9 through 12 for the previous year shall have the growth factor applied to the previous year's weighted pupil units when calculating the allocation of money under this Subsection (4).(c)An LEA may use funds received through the general allocation described in this Subsection (4) for Technology-Life-Careers and student leadership organizations.(5)(a)The state board shall establish rules for upgrading high school career and technical education programs.(b)The rules shall reflect career and technical training and actual marketable job skills in society.(c)The rules shall include procedures to assist school districts and charter schools to convert existing programs that are not preparing students for the job market into programs that will accomplish that purpose.(6)Programs that do not meet state board standards may not be funded under this section.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53F-2-316 is amended to read:53F-2-316Effective 07/01/26. Emergency funding for schools with increased enrollment of students learning English.(1)As used in this section,: (a)"Interrupted formal education" means a student who was not born in any state and has not been attending one or more schools in any one or more states for at least 2 full academic years.(b)"student"Student learning English" means a student, currently enrolled at a public elementary or secondary educational institution, whose most recent score on an English language proficiency assessment is the lowest score available under the given assessmentwho has experienced an interrupted formal education.(2)(a)An LEA may receive emergency funding from the state board if enrollment, at a school within the LEA, of students learning English increases by:(i)75% 40% or more above the previous three-year average enrollment for students learning English in the school; and(ii)3010 or more students above the previous three-year average enrollment for students learning English in the school.(b)An LEA shall ensure that an application the LEA submits under Subsection (3)(a):(i)demonstrates substantial need for the emergency funding;(ii)includes the percentage by which the school's student learning English enrollment exceeds the previous three-year average for the school; and(iii)demonstrates that the school has insufficient existing funds to adequately support the increased student learning English enrollment.(c)Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), the state board may approve an LEA to receive emergency funding under this section if:(i)the LEA demonstrates a significant enrollment increase of students learning English that does not meet the threshold described in Subsection (2)(a); and(ii)the LEA demonstrates that the enrollment increase creates a substantial need for emergency funding.(3)The state board shall:(a)establish and oversee the application process to award emergency funding;(b)in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, create rules to:(i)determine a method for measuring an increase in enrollment at a school; and(ii)identify a school that meets the threshold requirement described in Subsection (2)(a); and(c)subject to the availability of funds or legislative appropriations, prioritize applications and distribute funding based on:(i)the greatest percentage increase in students learning English enrollment in the school; and(ii)the severity of the financial need of the school.(4)An LEA shall use emergency funds received under this section to:(a)provide training or certification to teachers on the instruction of a student learning English;(b)reduce the number of students learning English in a class;(c)hire an aide to assist with students learning English in the classroom; or(d)provide other resources specific to the needs of a student learning English.(5)An LEA may not use emergency funding received under this section for administrative expenses.(6)(a)The state board shall draw the emergency funding described in Subsection (2)(a) from nonlapsing funds remaining in the at-risk weighted pupil unit described in Section 53F-2-314.(b)The state board may not draw, from the at-risk weighted pupil unit, more than $500,000, per fiscal year, for the emergency funding described in this section.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 53F-9-204 is amended to read:53F-9-204Effective 07/01/26. Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account.(1)There is created within the Uniform School Fund a restricted account known as the "Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account."(2)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the account shall be funded from the following revenue sources:(i)15% of the difference between, as determined by the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst:(A)the estimated amount of ongoing Income Tax Fund and Uniform School Fund revenue available for the Legislature to appropriate for the next fiscal year; and(B)the amount of ongoing appropriations from the Income Tax Fund and Uniform School Fund in the current fiscal year; and(ii)other appropriations as the Legislature may designate.(b)If the appropriation described in Subsection (2)(a) would cause the ongoing appropriations to the account to exceed 11% of Uniform School Fund appropriations described in Section 53F-9-201.1 for the same fiscal year, the Legislature shall appropriate only those funds necessary to ensure that the ongoing appropriations to the account equal 11% of Uniform School Fund appropriations for that fiscal year.(3)Subject to the availability of ongoing appropriations to the account, in accordance with Utah Constitution, Article X, Section 5, Subsection (4), the ongoing appropriation to the account shall be used to fund:(a)except for a year described in Subsection (3)(b) or (c), one-time appropriations to the public education system, including at least $65,000,000 to the Catalyst Center Grant Program described in Section 53E-3-507.1 described in Subsection (6);(b)the Minimum School Program for a year in which Income Tax Fund revenue and Uniform School Fund revenue are insufficient to fund:(i)ongoing appropriations to the public education system; and(ii)enrollment growth and inflation estimates, as defined in Section 53F-9-201.1; and(c)the minimum basic local amount as defined in Section 53F-2-301 for a year in which the minimum basic tax rate, as defined in Section 53F-2-301, is insufficient to generate the amount described in Subsection 53F-2-301(2)(a).(4)(a)The account shall earn interest.(b)All interest earned on account money shall be deposited in the account.(5)On or before December 31, 2023, and every three years thereafter, the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall:(a)review the percentages described in Subsections (2)(a)(i) and (2)(b); and(b)recommend to the Executive Appropriations Committee any changes based on the review described in Subsection (5)(a).(6)In preparing budget bills for a given fiscal year, the Executive Appropriations Committee shall make the one-time appropriations described in Subsection (3)(a) by appropriating at least the lesser of 10% of the total amount of the one-time appropriations to:(a)the lesser of 10% of the total amount of the one-time appropriations or the cost of providing 32 paid professional hours for teachers in accordance with Section 53F-7-203;(b)the amount to make the distribution for teaching supplies and materials required under Section 53F-2-527;(c)the cost of the Stipends for Future Educators Grant Program described in Section 53F-5-223; and(d)the cost of the Rural School Sports Facilities Grant Program described in Section 53F-10-303.; and(e)$65,000,000 to the Catalyst Center Grant Program described in Section 53E-3-507.1.(7)No later than October 15 of each year, the state board shall report to the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst an estimated cost for each of the one-time appropriations described in Subsection (6).

Section 5:
Section 5.  FY 2026 Appropriations.The following sums of money are appropriated for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026. These are additions to amounts previously appropriated for fiscal year 2026. Subsection 5(a).Operating and Capital BudgetsUnder the terms and conditions of Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act, the Legislature appropriates the following sums of money from the funds or accounts indicated for the use and support of the government of the state of Utah.PUBLIC EDUCATIONSTATE BOARD OF EDUCATION - MINIMUM SCHOOL PROGRAMITEM 1State Board of Education - Minimum School Program - Basic School ProgramFrom Beginning Nonlapsing Balances(5,903,900)From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(63,279,100)Foreign Exchange(107,200)Special Education - Extended Year for Special Educators25,200Enrollment Growth Contingency(19,101,000)Mid and Final Year Distribution Balancing(50,000,000)ITEM 2State Board of Education - Minimum School Program - Related to Basic School ProgramsFrom Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, One-time6,443,300From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances22,338,900From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(1,149,600)At-Risk Students - Gang Prevention and Intervention1,237,800Youth in Custody113,400Adult Education690,400Enhancement for Accelerated Students513,300Concurrent Enrollment5,800Charter School Local Replacement6,443,300Educator Salary Adjustments10,400Salary Supplement for Highly Needed Educators2,233,400Teacher Supplies and Materials1,979,600Beverley Taylor Sorenson Elem. Arts Learning Program832,000Special Education - Intensive Services15,600Digital Teaching and Learning Program1,914,700Effective Teachers in High Poverty Schools Incentive Program856,700Elementary School Counselor Program364,300Teacher and Student Success Program117,700Student Health and Counseling Support Program6,752,900Grants for Professional Learning21,200Charter School Funding Base Program530,100Grow Your Own Teacher and Counselor Pipeline3,000,000ITEM 3State Board of Education - Minimum School Program - Voted and Board Local Levy ProgramsFrom Beginning Nonlapsing Balances26,422,600Voted Local Levy Program11,017,500Board Local Levy Program15,405,100STATE BOARD OF EDUCATIONITEM 4State Board of Education - Child Nutrition ProgramsFrom Beginning Nonlapsing Balances2,618,200From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(2,618,200)ITEM 5State Board of Education - Educator LicensingFrom Beginning Nonlapsing Balances659,700From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(659,700)ITEM 6State Board of Education - Fine Arts OutreachFrom Beginning Nonlapsing Balances466,500From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(196,500)Professional Outreach Programs in the Schools200,000Provisional Program70,000ITEM 7State Board of Education - Contracted Initiatives and GrantsFrom Autism Awareness Restricted Account, One-time(50,700)From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances166,523,600From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(98,370,600)Autism Awareness(50,700)Carson Smith Scholarships(446,200)Contracts and Grants(4,195,000)Early Warning Program2,000,000General Financial Literacy100,000Interventions for Reading Difficulties10,700IT Academy4,100Paraeducator to Teacher Scholarships25,700ProStart Culinary Arts Program100,000UPSTART(1,900)ULEAD(47,100)Supplemental Educational Improvement Matching Grants3,900Education Technology Management System300,000Utah Fits All Scholarship Program14,483,800School Safety and Support Grant Program50,000,000Child Sexual Abuse Prevention Grant Program500,000Child Sexual Abuse Prevention1,000,000Utah Private Course Choice Empowerment215,000Utah Anti-Bullying Coalition300,000Student Credential Account3,800,000ITEM 8State Board of Education - MSP Categorical Program AdministrationFrom Beginning Nonlapsing Balances1,804,000From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(1,381,000)Dual Immersion40,000Special Education State Programs100,000Youth-in-Custody70,000State Safety and Support Program200,000Student Health and Counseling Support Program13,000ITEM 9State Board of Education - Regional Education Service AgenciesFrom Income Tax Fund, One-time32,400Regional Education Service Agencies32,400ITEM 10State Board of Education - Science OutreachFrom Beginning Nonlapsing Balances261,300Informal Science Education Enhancement279,000Provisional Program(17,700)ITEM 11State Board of Education - Policy, Communication,  OversightFrom Beginning Nonlapsing Balances(1,159,400)From Closing Nonlapsing Balances1,569,800Student Mental Health Screenings410,400ITEM 12State Board of Education - System Standards  AccountabilityFrom Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, One-time35,537,800From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances16,625,900From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(16,076,500)Career and Technical Education146,400Special Education174,600CPR Training Grant Program228,400CTE Catalyst Center35,537,800ITEM 13State Board of Education - State Charter School BoardFrom Beginning Nonlapsing Balances(698,800)From Closing Nonlapsing Balances698,800ITEM 14State Board of Education - Utah Schools for the Deaf and the BlindFrom Beginning Nonlapsing Balances(5,173,300)From Closing Nonlapsing Balances9,440,500Administration3,626,400Transportation and Support Services489,500Utah State Instructional Materials Access Center19,000School for the Blind132,300ITEM 15State Board of Education - Statewide Online Education Program SubsidyFrom Beginning Nonlapsing Balances678,800From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(678,800)ITEM 16State Board of Education - State Board and Administrative OperationsFrom Revenue Transfers, One-time(35,537,800)From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances118,499,500From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(122,164,900)Financial Operations149,900Indirect Cost Pool635,000Data and Statistics426,500School Trust100,000Statewide Financial Management Systems Grants1,396,200Excellence in Education and Leadership(45,000,000)Teacher Excellence Pilot Program2,989,200Self-Government Skills Pilot Program100,000Subsection 5(b).Expendable Funds and AccountsThe Legislature has reviewed the following expendable funds. The Legislature authorizes the State Division of Finance to transfer amounts between funds and accounts as indicated. Outlays and expenditures from the funds or accounts to which the money is transferred may be made without further legislative action, in accordance with statutory provisions relating to the funds or accounts.PUBLIC EDUCATIONSTATE BOARD OF EDUCATION - SCHOOL BUILDING PROGRAMSITEM 17State Board of Education - School Building Programs - Charter School Revolving AccountFrom Beginning Fund Balance182,000From Closing Fund Balance(182,000)ITEM 18State Board of Education - School Building Programs - School Building Revolving AccountFrom Beginning Fund Balance(42,800)From Closing Fund Balance42,800STATE BOARD OF EDUCATIONITEM 19State Board of Education - Hospitality and Tourism Mgmt. Education Acct.From Beginning Fund Balance233,700From Closing Fund Balance(233,700)ITEM 20State Board of Education - Charter School Closure Reserve AccountFrom Beginning Fund Balance244,600From Closing Fund Balance(244,600)Subsection 5(c).Restricted Fund and Account TransfersThe Legislature authorizes the State Division of Finance to transfer the following amounts between the following funds or accounts as indicated. Expenditures and outlays from the funds to which the money is transferred must be authorized by an appropriation.PUBLIC EDUCATIONITEM 21Income Tax Fund Restricted - Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted AccountFrom Uniform School Fund, One-time35,537,800From Beginning Fund Balance(268,800)From Closing Fund Balance268,800Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account35,537,800ITEM 22Income Tax Fund Restricted - Minimum Basic Growth AccountFrom Interest Income, One-time(2,633,500)Minimum Basic Growth Account(2,633,500)ITEM 23Income Tax Fund Restricted - Underage Drinking and Substance Abuse Prevention Program Restricted AccountFrom Interest Income, One-time(58,300)Underage Drinking and Substance Abuse Prevention Program Restricted Account(58,300)ITEM 24Income Tax Fund Restricted - Local Levy Growth AccountFrom Interest Income, One-time(3,570,700)Local Levy Growth Account(3,570,700)ITEM 25Income Tax Fund Restricted - Teacher and Student Success AccountFrom Interest Income, One-time(5,505,800)Teacher and Student Success Account(5,505,800)Subsection 5(d).Transfers to Unrestricted FundsThe Legislature authorizes the State Division of Finance to transfer the following amounts to the unrestricted General Fund, Income Tax Fund, or Uniform School Fund, as indicated, from the restricted funds or accounts indicated. Expenditures and outlays from the General Fund, Income Tax Fund, or Uniform School Fund must be authorized by an appropriation.PUBLIC EDUCATIONITEM 26Uniform School FundFrom Nonlapsing Balances - From State Board of Education - State Board and Administrative Operations35,537,800Uniform School Fund, One-time35,537,800Subsection 5(e).Fiduciary FundsThe Legislature has reviewed proposed revenues, expenditures, fund balances, and changes in fund balances for the following fiduciary funds.PUBLIC EDUCATIONSTATE BOARD OF EDUCATIONITEM 27State Board of Education - Education Tax Check-off Lease RefundingFrom Beginning Fund Balance800From Closing Fund Balance(800)ITEM 28State Board of Education - Schools for the Deaf and the Blind Donation FundFrom Beginning Fund Balance(9,000)From Closing Fund Balance9,000SCHOOL AND INSTITUTIONAL TRUST FUND OFFICEITEM 29School and Institutional Trust Fund Office - Permanent State School FundFrom Beginning Fund Balance356,182,300From Closing Fund Balance(356,182,300)

Section 6:
Section 6.  FY 2027 Appropriations.The following sums of money are appropriated for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027. These are additions to amounts previously appropriated for fiscal year 2027. Subsection 6(a).Operating and Capital BudgetsUnder the terms and conditions of Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act, the Legislature appropriates the following sums of money from the funds or accounts indicated for the use and support of the government of the state of Utah.PUBLIC EDUCATIONSTATE BOARD OF EDUCATION - MINIMUM SCHOOL PROGRAMITEM 30State Board of Education - Minimum School Program - Basic School ProgramFrom Uniform School Fund3,167,630,600From Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, One-time77,000,000From Local Revenue866,842,700From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances67,324,700From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(67,324,700)Kindergarten (40,379 WPUs)196,645,700Grades 1 - 12 (593,727 WPUs)2,891,450,500Foreign Exchange (404 WPUs)1,967,500Necessarily Existent Small Schools (14,035 WPUs)68,350,500Special Education - Add-on (102,348 WPUs)498,434,800Special Education - Self-Contained (11,928 WPUs)58,089,400Special Education - Preschool (10,943 WPUs)53,292,400Special Education - Extended School Year (443 WPUs)2,157,400Special Education - Impact Aid (1,273 WPUs)6,199,500Special Education - Extended Year for Special Educators (909 WPUs)4,426,800Class Size Reduction (40,995 WPUs)199,645,700Students At-Risk Add-on (26,861 WPUs)130,813,100In accordance with UCA 63J-1-903, the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education - Minimum School Program report on the following Basic School Program line item performance measures for FY 2027: 1. Four-Year Cohort Graduation Rate of State of Utah (Target = 92.1%); 2. Number of students K-12 that were expelled during the reported academic year (Target = 37); 3. Number of students K-12 that were suspended during the reported academic year (Target = 9,655); 4. Percentage of 4th grade students proficient or above on English Language Arts National Assessment of Educational Progress (Target = 64.1%); 5. Percentage of 4th grade students proficient or above on mathematics National Assessment of Educational Progress (Target = 66.5%); 6. Percentage of 4th grade students proficient or above on science National Assessment of Educational Progress (Target = 67.1%); 7. Percentage of 8th grade students proficient or above on English Language Arts National Assessment of Educational Progress (Target = 64.1%); 8. Percentage of 8th grade students proficient or above on mathematics National Assessment of Educational Progress (Target = 66.5%); 9. Percentage of 8th grade students proficient or above on science National Assessment of Educational Progress (Target = 67.1%); 10. Percentage of Kindergarten students making typical or better progress on Acadience Math PoP (Target = 60%); 11. Percentage of Kindergarten students making typical or better progress on Acadience Reading PoP (Target = 60%); 12. Percentage of students in grades 1-12 in public schools that are chronically absent (Target = 17.33%); 13. Percentage of students in Utah scoring 18 or above on American College Test (Target = 74%); 14. Percentage of students K-12 that were expelled during the reported academic year (Target = 0.07%); 15. Percentage of students K-12 that were suspended during the reported academic year (Target = 1.43%); 16. Percentage of students making typical or better progress on Acadience Math Pathways of Progress (Target = 60%); 17. Percentage of students making typical or better progress on Acadience Reading Pathways of Progress (Target = 60%); 18. Percentage of students proficient on English Language Arts in grades 3-8 Readiness, Improvement, Success, Empowerment or Dynamic Learning Maps (Target = 63.33%); 19. Percentage of Students Proficient on Mathematics in Grades 3-8 Readiness, Improvement, Success, Empowerment or Dynamic Learning Maps (Target = 62.8%); 20. Percentage of students proficient on science in grades 3-8 Readiness, Improvement, Success, Empowerment or Dynamic Learning Maps (Target = 65.67%); 21. Percentage of students successfully completing readiness coursework (Target = 86%);  and 22. Percentage of teachers who are professionally qualified for their assignment (Target = 87.3%).ITEM 31State Board of Education - Minimum School Program - Related to Basic School ProgramsFrom Uniform School Fund1,328,175,500From Automobile Driver Education Tax Account2,000,000From Charter School Levy Account54,158,100From Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, One-time87,100,000From Teacher and Student Success Account228,549,600From Trust Distribution Account133,551,600From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances5,597,900From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(416,600)Pupil Transportation To  From School137,507,900Flexible Allocation272,369,400Youth in Custody34,657,200Adult Education19,477,700Enhancement for Accelerated Students7,534,600School LAND Trust Program133,551,600Charter School Local Replacement336,367,000Educator Salary Adjustments509,900,100Salary Supplement for Highly Needed Educators26,036,200Dual Immersion8,020,300Teacher Supplies and Materials14,300,000Beverley Taylor Sorenson Elem. Arts Learning Program19,445,000Teacher and Student Success Program228,549,600Charter School Funding Base Program7,865,000English Language Learner Software1,840,100Grow Your Own Teacher and Counselor Pipeline2,994,400Educator Professional Time78,300,000In accordance with UCA 63J-1-903, the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education - Minimum School Program report on the following Related to Basic School Programs line item performance measures for FY 2027: 1. Percent of educators in Digital Teaching and Learning LEAs that have an EdTech endorsement (Target = 10%) and 2. Percent of youth with high mental health treatment needs identified by Student Health and Risk Prevention Data (Target = 16.4%).ITEM 32State Board of Education - Minimum School Program - Voted and Board Local Levy ProgramsFrom Uniform School Fund105,927,300From Local Levy Growth Account127,553,300From Local Revenue1,180,371,500From Minimum Basic Growth Account56,250,000Voted Local Levy Program874,392,400Board Local Levy Program595,709,700STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION - SCHOOL BUILDING PROGRAMSITEM 33State Board of Education - School Building Programs - Capital Outlay ProgramsFrom Income Tax Fund8,860,900From Minimum Basic Growth Account18,750,000Foundation Program27,610,900In accordance with UCA 63J-1-903, the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education - School Building Programs report on the following Capital Outlay Programs line item performance measures for FY 2027: 1. Percentage of loan applications processed and approved within 90 days (Target = 100%) and 2. Percentage of schools repaying loans on time (Target = 100%).ITEM 34State Board of Education - School Building Programs - Utah Charter School Finance AuthorityFrom Charter School Reserve Account50,000Utah Charter School Finance Authority50,000ITEM 35State Board of Education - School Building Programs - Public Education Capital ProjectsFrom Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, One-time5,000,000Small District Athletic Facilities Grants5,000,000STATE BOARD OF EDUCATIONITEM 36State Board of Education - Educator LicensingFrom Income Tax Fund5,267,500From Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, One-time12,400,000From Revenue Transfers(384,900)From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances1,474,000From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(1,076,500)Educator Licensing15,921,700STEM Endorsement Incentives1,312,100National Board-Certified Teachers446,300In accordance with UCA 63J-1-903, the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education report on the following Educator Licensing line item performance measures for FY 2027: 1. Number of Incidents Reported for Educator Violations (Target = 0); 2. Number of License Areas Recommended by Utah Institutions of Higher Education (Target = 3,000); 3. Percentage of Educators With a District or Charter-Specific License (Less Than) (Target = 4%); 4. Percentage of Educators With a Professional License (Target = 91%); 5. Percentage of Educators With an Associate License (Less Than) (Target = 5%); 6. Percentage of K-12 Mentored Teachers With Positive Impact on Improved Instruction (Target = 86.67%);  and 7. Percentage of K-12 Teachers That Had a Mentor Assigned as a New Educator (Target = 78.2%).ITEM 37State Board of Education - Fine Arts OutreachFrom Income Tax Fund6,175,000From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances203,600From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(158,700)Professional Outreach Programs in the Schools6,153,700Provisional Program5,100Subsidy Program61,100In accordance with UCA 63J-1-903, the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education report on the following Fine Arts Outreach line item performance measures for FY 2027: 1. Number of Public School Educators Receiving Services From POPS Program Providers (Target = 14,000); 2. Number of Students Receiving Services From POPS Program Organizations (Target = 442,000); 3. Percentage of Charter Schools Served by POPS Program Over a Three-year Period (Target = 100%);  and 4. Percentage of School Districts Served by POPS Program Over a Three-year Period (Target = 100%).ITEM 38State Board of Education - Contracted Initiatives and GrantsFrom General Fund8,623,800From Income Tax Fund19,748,500From Revenue Transfers(147,700)From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances91,763,700From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(89,656,600)Carson Smith Scholarships8,598,400General Financial Literacy486,200Partnerships for Student Success3,479,900UPSTART29,700ULEAD399,100Supplemental Educational Improvement Matching Grants2,700Competency-Based Education Grants3,059,900Special Needs Opportunity Scholarship Administration4,130,100Education Innovation Program549,900Pupil Transportation Rural School Reimbursement500,000Center for the School of the Future200,000Utah Private Course Choice Empowerment8,895,800In accordance with UCA 63J-1-903, the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education report on the following Contracted Initiatives and Grants line item performance measures for FY 2027: 1. Percentage High School Graduation Rate for Students at Partnership for Student Success Schools (Target = 90.6%); 2. Percentage of Carson Smith Scholarship Participating Schools Complying With Annual Reporting Requirements (Target = 100%); 3. Percentage of Educators in DTL LEAs That Have an EdTech Endorsement (Target = 10%); 4. Percentage proficient of 3rd grade students at Partnership for Student Success schools in English Language Arts (Target = 52%);  and 5. Percentage Proficient of 8th Grade Students at Partnership for Student Success Schools in Mathematics (Target = 49.3%).ITEM 39State Board of Education - MSP Categorical Program AdministrationFrom Income Tax Fund5,634,400From Revenue Transfers(390,800)From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances1,859,500From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(1,407,800)Adult Education308,500Beverley Taylor Sorenson Elem. Arts Learning Program270,000Dual Immersion532,000At-Risk Students554,900Special Education State Programs310,400Youth-in-Custody1,202,400Early Literacy Program491,300State Safety and Support Program542,700Early Learning Training and Assessment1,242,500Early Intervention240,600In accordance with UCA 63J-1-903, the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education report on the following MSP Categorical Program Administration line item performance measures for FY 2027: 1. Arts Learning Program Implementation (Target = 50); 2. Beverley Taylor Sorenson Arts Learning Program Survey (Target = 100%); 3. Number of Dual Language Immersion educators receiving professional learning (Target = 900); 4. Number of guest Dual Language Immersion educators receiving direct support services (Target = 180);  and 5. Percentage of educators demonstrating competency in Science of Reading (Target = 95%).ITEM 40State Board of Education - Regional Education Service AgenciesFrom Income Tax Fund2,217,600Regional Education Service Agencies2,217,600In accordance with UCA 63J-1-903, the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education report on the following Regional Education Service Agencies line item performance measures for FY 2027: 1. Number of Professional Learning Hours Provided by RESAs (Target = 5,000); 2. Percentage Match of Local Effort to RESA Budget (Target = 100%); 3. Percentage of APPEL Completers in 3rd Year That Receive Professional License (Target = 60%);  and 4. Percentage of RESA LEAs That Adopt CIS Controls (Target = 70%).ITEM 41State Board of Education - Science OutreachFrom Income Tax Fund6,265,000Informal Science Education Enhancement6,265,000In accordance with UCA 63J-1-903, the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education report on the following Science Outreach line item performance measures for FY 2027: 1. Number of ISEE In-person Student Experiences (Target = 250,000); 2. Number of ISEE Professional Learning Opportunities Provided to Utah Teachers (Target = 200);  and 3. Number of ISEE Students Participating in Field Trips (Target = 279,000).ITEM 42State Board of Education - Policy, Communication,  OversightFrom General Fund415,400From Income Tax Fund17,469,200From Federal Funds62,777,700From Dedicated Credits Revenue64,300From Electronic Cigarette Substance and Nicotine Product Proceeds Restricted Account5,086,700From Mineral Lease Account167,700From Revenue Transfers(1,012,600)From Underage Drinking and Substance Abuse Prevention Program Restricted Account1,759,500From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances31,252,600From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(31,367,200)Teacher Retention in Indigenous Schools Grants728,500Policy and Communication2,474,500Student Support Services77,509,800School Turnaround and Leadership Development Act5,900,500ITEM 43State Board of Education - System Standards  AccountabilityFrom General Fund100From Income Tax Fund31,806,700From Federal Funds162,600,000From Expendable Receipts453,400From Automobile Driver Education Tax Account5,117,500From Dedicated Credits Revenue927,700From Mineral Lease Account408,500From Revenue Transfers(2,005,400)From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances25,541,100From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(12,376,400)Student Achievement508,500Teaching and Learning28,199,000Assessment and Accountability26,058,600Special Education141,861,900RTC Fees101,900Early Literacy Outcomes Improvement15,714,100CPR Training Grant Program29,200In accordance with UCA 63J-1-903, the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education report on the following System Standards  Accountability line item performance measures for FY 2027: 1. Number of course completers for trauma informed courses with Utah State Board of Education (Target = 1,530); 2. Number of educators engaged in State Board of Education created coursework (Target = 4,000); 3. Number of educators engaged in Utah State Board of Education Alternate Path to Professional Educator Licensure for Special Education licensure program (Target = 300); 4. Percentage of charter schools participating in Personalized, Competency-Based Learning Professional Learning (Target = 28%); 5. Percentage of districts participating in Personalized, Competency-Based Learning Professional Learning (Target = 33%); 6. Percentage of educators engaging in Career  Technical Education plans and upskilling (Target = 61%);  and 7. Percentage of Local Education Agencies meeting Individuals with Disabilities Education Act state targets (Target = 100%).ITEM 44State Board of Education - State Charter School BoardFrom Income Tax Fund4,005,900From Revenue Transfers(275,100)From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances1,849,800From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(478,200)State Charter School Board  Administration2,334,000Statewide Charter School Training Programs550,000New Charter School Start-up Funding2,218,400In accordance with UCA 63J-1-903, the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education report on the following State Charter School Board line item performance measures for FY 2027: 1. Local Charter School Outreach (Target = 100%); 2. Open Meetings Act Compliance - Charter Schools (Target = 100%);  and 3. State Charter School Board Member Training (Target = 50%).ITEM 45State Board of Education - Utah Schools for the Deaf and the BlindFrom Income Tax Fund47,132,300From Federal Funds118,500From Dedicated Credits Revenue5,173,600From Revenue Transfers6,795,200Administration21,117,300Transportation and Support Services13,138,200Utah State Instructional Materials Access Center1,936,900School for the Deaf13,099,500School for the Blind9,927,700In accordance with UCA 63J-1-903, the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education report on the following Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind line item performance measures for FY 2027: 1. Compliance With Federal, State, and USBE Administrative Rules (Target = 100%); 2. Educators Retention (Target = 85%); 3. Graduation Rate for All Campus Enrolled USB Students (Target = 90%); 4. Graduation Rate for All Campus Enrolled USD Students (Target = 90%); 5. Number of Safety Incidents During Student Transportation (Target = 0%); 6. Operational and Maintenance Expenses (Target = 8%); 7. Percentage of Blind/visually Impaired Students Complete Transition Outcomes, as Outlined in Their Individual Transition Plans, Within One Year of Their Program Completion (Target = 80%); 8. Percentage of Eligible Students Receiving Transportation Services (Target = 100%); 9. Percentage of USB Families That Receive the Mandated Service Minutes as Outlined in Their Individual Family Service Plans (IFSPs) (Target = 90%); 10. Percentage of USB Outreach Students Receive the Mandated Service Minutes in Their Individualized Education Plan (IEPs) (Target = 90%); 11. Percentage of USD Deaf Students Achieve Their Vocational Skills Within 1 Year of Program Completion (Target = 80%); 12. Percentage of USD Families That Receive the Mandated Service Minutes as Outlined in Their Individual Family Service Plans (IFSPs) (Target = 85%);  and 13. Percentage of USD Outreach Students Receive the Mandated Service Minutes in Their Individualized Education Plan (IEPs) (Target = 90%).ITEM 46State Board of Education - Statewide Online Education Program SubsidyFrom Income Tax Fund4,543,200From Revenue Transfers(60,900)From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances2,165,800From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(761,400)Statewide Online Education Program1,488,000Home School Student Support2,059,700Small High School Support2,339,000ITEM 47State Board of Education - State Board and Administrative OperationsFrom General Fund200From Income Tax Fund17,145,100From Federal Funds1,895,900From Mineral Lease Account1,236,500From Land Exchange Distribution Account16,300From School and Institutional Trust Fund Management Acct.167,100From School Readiness Restricted Account72,300From Revenue Transfers6,505,800From Trust Distribution Account833,000From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances130,736,100From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(118,963,000)Financial Operations5,555,700Information Technology11,160,400Indirect Cost Pool9,630,900Data and Statistics2,626,300School Trust894,500Board and Administration9,430,100Teacher Excellence Pilot Program297,400Self-Government Skills Pilot Program50,000ITEM 48State Board of Education - Utah Fits All Scholarship ProgramFrom Income Tax Fund47,100From Utah Fits All Scholarship Program Restricted Account122,587,600Student Scholarships and Administration122,634,700ITEM 49State Board of Education - Statewide Technology ContractsFrom Income Tax Fund20,631,400From Balance Transfers, One-time8,388,200From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(6,082,600)Computer Science Initiative6,691,300Education Technology Management System1,900,800Elementary Reading Assessment Software2,180,900School Data Collection  Analysis900,000Software Licenses for Early Literacy10,764,000IT Academy500,000SCHOOL AND INSTITUTIONAL TRUST FUND OFFICEITEM 50School and Institutional Trust Fund Office - School and Institutional Trust Fund Office OperationsFrom School and Institutional Trust Fund Management Acct.4,379,100School and Institutional Trust Fund Office4,379,100In accordance with UCA 63J-1-903, the Legislature intends that the School and Institutional Trust Fund Office report on the following School and Institutional Trust Fund Office Operations line item performance measures for FY 2027: 1. Average annual number of hours of staff engagement and development per FTE (Target = 6) and 2. Percentage of full-time staff turnover over a three-year period (Target = 25%).Subsection 6(b).Expendable Funds and AccountsThe Legislature has reviewed the following expendable funds. The Legislature authorizes the State Division of Finance to transfer amounts between funds and accounts as indicated. Outlays and expenditures from the funds or accounts to which the money is transferred may be made without further legislative action, in accordance with statutory provisions relating to the funds or accounts.PUBLIC EDUCATIONSTATE BOARD OF EDUCATION - SCHOOL BUILDING PROGRAMSITEM 51State Board of Education - School Building Programs - Charter School Revolving AccountFrom Dedicated Credits Revenue4,600From Interest Income132,200From Repayments1,511,400From Beginning Fund Balance8,149,700From Closing Fund Balance(8,286,500)Charter School Revolving Account1,511,400ITEM 52State Board of Education - School Building Programs - School Building Revolving AccountFrom Repayments1,465,600From Dedicated Credits Revenue500From Interest Income112,800From Beginning Fund Balance10,426,500From Closing Fund Balance(10,539,800)School Building Revolving Account1,465,600STATE BOARD OF EDUCATIONITEM 53State Board of Education - Charter School Closure Reserve AccountFrom Beginning Fund Balance1,823,400From Closing Fund Balance(1,823,400)Subsection 6(c).Restricted Fund and Account TransfersThe Legislature authorizes the State Division of Finance to transfer the following amounts between the following funds or accounts as indicated. Expenditures and outlays from the funds to which the money is transferred must be authorized by an appropriation.PUBLIC EDUCATIONITEM 54Income Tax Fund Restricted - Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted AccountFrom Uniform School Fund483,474,000Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account483,474,000ITEM 55Income Tax Fund Restricted - Utah Fits All Scholarship Program Restricted AccountFrom Income Tax Fund122,587,600Utah Fits All Scholarship Program Restricted Account122,587,600ITEM 56Income Tax Fund Restricted - Minimum Basic Growth AccountFrom Income Tax Fund75,000,000From Interest Income2,633,500Minimum Basic Growth Account77,633,500ITEM 57Income Tax Fund Restricted - Underage Drinking and Substance Abuse Prevention Program Restricted AccountFrom Interest Income58,300From Liquor Control Fund1,750,000Underage Drinking and Substance Abuse Prevention Program Restricted Account1,808,300ITEM 58Income Tax Fund Restricted - Local Levy Growth AccountFrom Income Tax Fund108,461,300From Uniform School Fund19,092,000From Interest Income3,570,700Local Levy Growth Account131,124,000ITEM 59Income Tax Fund Restricted - Teacher and Student Success AccountFrom Income Tax Fund228,549,600From Interest Income5,505,800Teacher and Student Success Account234,055,400Subsection 6(d).Fiduciary FundsThe Legislature has reviewed proposed revenues, expenditures, fund balances, and changes in fund balances for the following fiduciary funds.PUBLIC EDUCATIONSTATE BOARD OF EDUCATIONITEM 60State Board of Education - Education Tax Check-off Lease RefundingFrom Beginning Fund Balance30,200From Closing Fund Balance(28,000)Education Tax Check-off Lease Refunding2,200ITEM 61State Board of Education - Schools for the Deaf and the Blind Donation FundFrom Dedicated Credits Revenue115,000From Interest Income5,400From Beginning Fund Balance279,000From Closing Fund Balance(283,000)Schools for the Deaf and the Blind Donation Fund116,400In accordance with UCA 63J-1-903, the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education report on the following Schools for the Deaf and the Blind Donation Fund line item performance measure for FY 2027: Percentage of Students in Need Receiving Assistive Technology (Target = 5%).SCHOOL AND INSTITUTIONAL TRUST FUND OFFICEITEM 62School and Institutional Trust Fund Office - Permanent State School FundFrom Beginning Fund Balance3,819,828,200From Closing Fund Balance(3,819,828,200)In accordance with UCA 63J-1-903, the Legislature intends that the School and Institutional Trust Fund Office report on the following Permanent State School Fund line item performance measures for FY 2027: 1. Achieve annualized volatility below a comparison portfolio of 70% MSCI ACWI (global stocks) and 30% Barclays Aggregate (US bonds) as of June 30 of each year (Target = 9) and 2. Percentage of increase in fund distributions annually (Target = 3%).

Section 7:
Section 7.  FY 2027 Appropriations.The following sums of money are appropriated for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027. These are additions to amounts previously appropriated for fiscal year 2027. Subsection 7(a).Operating and Capital BudgetsUnder the terms and conditions of Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act, the Legislature appropriates the following sums of money from the funds or accounts indicated for the use and support of the government of the state of Utah.PUBLIC EDUCATIONSTATE BOARD OF EDUCATION - MINIMUM SCHOOL PROGRAMITEM 63State Board of Education - Minimum School Program - Basic School ProgramFrom Uniform School Fund132,809,800Career and Technical Education - Add-on (27,271 WPUs)132,809,800ITEM 64State Board of Education - Minimum School Program - Related to Basic School ProgramsFrom Uniform School Fund69,009,300Concurrent Enrollment27,176,900Digital Teaching and Learning Program18,352,400Student Health and Counseling Support Program23,480,000STATE BOARD OF EDUCATIONITEM 65State Board of Education - Child Nutrition ProgramsFrom Income Tax Fund400From Federal Funds354,433,200From Dedicated Credits Revenue6,200From Dedicated Credit - Liquor Sales Revenue50,131,700From Revenue Transfers(570,300)From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances3,621,200From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(1,944,700)Child Nutrition374,139,400USDA Foods in School31,538,300ITEM 66State Board of Education - Contracted Initiatives and GrantsFrom Income Tax Fund4,920,300From Hospitality and Tourism Management Education Account126,200From Balance Transfers, One-time(8,388,200)From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances13,307,800Contracts and Grants4,581,800Early Warning Program3,204,200ProStart Culinary Arts Program535,100Child Sexual Abuse Prevention Grant Program500,000Child Sexual Abuse Prevention1,000,000High School Rodeo Athlete and Ambulance Grants145,000ITEM 67State Board of Education - MSP Categorical Program AdministrationFrom Income Tax Fund2,754,100From Revenue Transfers(124,700)From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances455,400From Closing Nonlapsing Balances(213,800)College and Career Counseling320,800Digital Teaching and Learning536,000CTE Online Assessments625,500CTE Student Organizations1,060,600Student Health and Counseling Support Program328,100ITEM 68State Board of Education - Policy, Communication,  OversightFrom Income Tax Fund2,000,000Student Mental Health Screenings1,000,000Suicide Prevention1,000,000ITEM 69State Board of Education - System Standards  AccountabilityFrom Income Tax Fund3,645,100From Federal Funds16,828,000From Dedicated Credits Revenue116,500From Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, One-time65,000,000From Beginning Nonlapsing Balances120,600Career and Technical Education19,660,200CTE Catalyst Center65,250,000CTE First Credential for All800,000Subsection 7(b).Expendable Funds and AccountsThe Legislature has reviewed the following expendable funds. The Legislature authorizes the State Division of Finance to transfer amounts between funds and accounts as indicated. Outlays and expenditures from the funds or accounts to which the money is transferred may be made without further legislative action, in accordance with statutory provisions relating to the funds or accounts.PUBLIC EDUCATIONSTATE BOARD OF EDUCATIONITEM 70State Board of Education - Hospitality and Tourism Mgmt. Education Acct.From Interest Income5,200From Designated Sales Tax173,800From Beginning Fund Balance1,186,500From Closing Fund Balance(1,141,700)Hospitality and Tourism Management Education Account223,800

Section 8:
Section 8.  Effective Date.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), this bill takes effect July 1, 2026.(2)The actions affecting Section 5, Fiscal Year 2026 Appropriations (Effective upon governor's approval) take effect:(a)except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), May 6, 2026; or(b)if approved by two-thirds of all members elected to each house:(i)upon approval by the governor;(ii)without the governor's signature, the day following the constitutional time limit of Utah Constitution, Article VII, Section 8; or(iii)in the case of a veto, the date of veto override.